Hawaii statutes.
§84-3 Definitions.

"Business" includes a corporation, a
partnership, a sole proprietorship, a trust or foundation, or any other
individual or organization carrying on a business, whether or not operated for
profit.

"Compensation" means any money, thing
of value, or economic benefit conferred on or received by any person in return
for services rendered or to be rendered by oneself or another.

"Controlling interest" means an
interest in a business or other undertaking which is sufficient in fact to
control, whether the interest be greater or less than fifty per cent.

"Employee" means any nominated,
appointed, or elected officer or employee of the State, including members of
boards, commissions, and committees, and employees under contract to the State
or of the constitutional convention, but excluding legislators, delegates to
the constitutional convention, justices and judges.

"Employment" means any rendering of
services for compensation.

"Financial interest" means an
interest held by an individual, the individual's spouse, or dependent children
which is:

(1) An ownership interest in a business.

(2) A creditor interest in an insolvent business.

(3) An employment, or prospective employment for
which negotiations have begun.

(4) An ownership interest in real or personal
property.

(5) A loan or other debtor interest.

(6) A directorship or officership in a business.

"Official act" or "official
action" means a decision, recommendation, approval, disapproval, or other
action, including inaction, which involves the use of discretionary authority.

"Official authority" includes
administrative or legislative powers of decision, recommendation, approval,
disapproval, or other discretionary action.

"State agency" includes the State,
the legislature and its committees, all executive departments, boards,
commissions, committees, bureaus, offices, the University of Hawaii, and all
independent commissions and other establishments of the state government but
excluding the courts.

"Task force" means a group convened
by resolution, statute, executive order, proclamation, or by invitation of the
legislature, governor, or another state officer, to study a specific subject or
issue, for a specific defined period of time, and to report to, offer a
recommendation to, or advise the legislature, governor, or a state officer. [L
1972, c 163, pt of §1; am L 1978, c 245, §1; am L 1979, c 91, §4; gen ch 1985;
am L 2012, c 208, §2]

Revision Note

Definitions restyled.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next